Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5346.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9201. (1) As used in this part: (a) "Camping" means attendance at a residential, day, troop, or travel camp conducted for more than 4 school-age children, apart from their parents, guardians, or persons in loco parentis for 5 or more days or parts of days in a 14-day period. (b) "Immunizing agent" means a vaccine, antibody preparation, or other substance used to increase an individual's immunity to a disease or infectious agent. (c) "Infectious agent" means that term as defined in R 325.9031 of the Michigan administrative code.Administrative Code. (d) "Registry" means the childhood immunization registry or Michigan care improvement registry established under section 9207. (2) In addition, article 1 contains general definitions and principles of construction applicable to all articles in this code. Sec. 9207. (1) The department shall establish a registry, to be known as the "childhood immunization registry", to record information regarding immunizations performed under this part. Beginning after the effective date of the amendatory act that added section 9227(2), April 4, 2006, the "childhood immunization registry" shall be is known as the "Michigan care improvement registry". The department shall enter information received under sections 2821 and 9206 in the registry. (2) The information contained in the registry is subject to the confidentiality and disclosure requirements of sections 2637 and 2888 and to the rules promulgated under section 9227. The department may access the information contained in the registry when necessary to fulfill its duties under this code. The department shall ensure that a user of the registry can query and extract information on the immunization status of school-aged children in this state, by school building. (3) Upon On the receipt of a written request from an individual who is 20 years of age or older, the department shall make any immunization information in the registry pertaining to that individual inaccessible. The written request shall must be in a form prescribed or otherwise authorized by the department.